test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-veena_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vēna: # Noun 37 'eng /est sadam/fin' - full paradigm
     vēna+N+Sg+Nom: vēna
     vēna+N+Sg+Gen: vēna
     vēna+N+Sg+Par: veinõ
     vēna+N+Sg+Dat: vēnan
     vēna+N+Sg+Ins: vēnaks
     vēna+N+Sg+Ill: veinõ
     vēna+N+Sg+Ela: vēnast
     vēna+N+Pl+Nom: vēnad
     vēna+N+Pl+Gen: vēnad 
     vēna+N+Pl+Par: veiņi
     vēna+N+Pl+Dat: vēnadõn
     vēna+N+Pl+Ins: vēnadõks
     vēna+N+Pl+Ill: vēniž
     vēna+N+Pl+Ela: vēnist
